test/src/morphology/noun-páradis_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Odd-syllable nouns, without those only in plural. Lexicon ÅRES,GÁMAS, SÅHKÅR, GAHPER, BENA, BAVSEV, GÅRDAL, RÁBEV, SEKKAS, DERDAJ, BØSOJ, GUOVSOJVUOJOJ, RITJAS, TJÅLKES, VÁJES, BÁRNEP, SÁGAS, SÁGE, BUTJES

Tests:
  Noun - boagos: # ÅRES
    boagos+N+Sg+Nom: boagos 
    boagos+N+Sg+Gen: båhkusa
    boagos+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: båhkusimme
    boagos+N+Sg+Acc: båhkusav
    boagos+N+Sg+Ine: båhkusin 
    boagos+N+Sg+Ill: båhkusij
    boagos+N+Sg+Ela: båhkusis
    boagos+N+Sg+Com: båhkusijn 
    boagos+N+Pl+Nom: båhkusa
    boagos+N+Pl+Gen: båhkusij
    boagos+N+Pl+Acc: båhkusijt
    boagos+N+Pl+Ine: båhkusijn
    boagos+N+Pl+Ill: båhkusijda
    boagos+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: båhkusijdasihtte 
    boagos+N+Pl+Ela: båhkusijs
    boagos+N+Pl+Com: båhkusij
    boagos+N+Ess: [båhkusin, boagon]
    boagos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: båhkusasj

  Noun - buonjos: # ÅRES
    buonjos+N+Sg+Nom: buonjos
    buonjos+N+Sg+Acc: buodnjusav
    buonjos+N+Sg+Com: buodnjusijn
    buonjos+N+Ess: [buonjon, buodnjusin]

  Noun - bálos: # ÅRES
    bálos+N+Sg+Nom: bálos
    bálos+N+Sg+Acc: bállusav
    bálos+N+Pl+Com: bállusij
    bálos+N+Ess: [bálon, bállusin]

  Noun - båros: # ÅRES
    båros+N+Sg+Nom: båros 
    båros+N+Sg+Ill: bårrusij 

  Noun - dieres: # ÅRES
    dieres+N+Sg+Nom: dieres 
    dieres+N+Sg+Ine: dærrásin
    dieres+N+Sg+Ill: dærrásij

  Noun - duber: # ÅRES
    duber+N+Sg+Nom: duber 
    duber+N+Sg+Gen: duhpára 
    duber+N+Sg+Ill: duhpárij

  Noun - gielov: # ÅRES
    gielov+N+Sg+Nom: gielov 
    gielov+N+Sg+Ine: giellumin
    gielov+N+Sg+Ill: giellumij

  Noun - gietjesj: # ÅRES
    gietjesj+N+Sg+Nom: gietjesj
    gietjesj+N+Sg+Ine: gætjátjin
    gietjesj+N+Sg+Ill: gætjátjij

  Noun - gæsás: #  GÁMAS
    gæsás+N+Sg+Nom: gæsás
    gæsás+N+Sg+Ine: gæssásin
    gæsás+N+Sg+Ill: gæssásij

  Noun - tjuorvas: # GÁMAS
    tjuorvas+N+Sg+Nom: tjuorvas 
    tjuorvas+N+Sg+Ill: tjuorvvasij
    tjuorvas+N+Pl+Nom: tjuorvvasa

  Noun - huvkas: # GÁMAS
    huvkas+N+Sg+Nom: huvkas 
    huvkas+N+Sg+Ine: huvkkasin 
    huvkas+N+Sg+Ill: huvkkasij

  Noun - germaj: # GÁMAS
    germaj+N+Sg+Nom: germaj 
    germaj+N+Sg+Gen: gærmmaha
    germaj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gærmmahimme
    germaj+N+Sg+Acc: gærmmahav
    germaj+N+Sg+Ine: gærmmahin 
    germaj+N+Sg+Ill: gærmmahij
    germaj+N+Sg+Ela: gærmmahis
    germaj+N+Sg+Com: gærmmahijn 
    germaj+N+Pl+Nom: gærmmaha
    germaj+N+Pl+Gen: gærmmahij
    germaj+N+Pl+Acc: gærmmahijt
    germaj+N+Pl+Ine: gærmmahijn
    germaj+N+Pl+Ill: gærmmahijda
    germaj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: gærmmahijdasihtte 
    germaj+N+Pl+Ela: gærmmahijs
    germaj+N+Pl+Com: gærmmahij
    germaj+N+Ess: gærmmahin
    germaj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gærmmahasj

  Noun - hávstar: # GÁMAS
    hávstar+N+Sg+Nom: hávstar 
    hávstar+N+Sg+Ine: hávsstarin 
    hávstar+N+Sg+Ill: hávsstarij

  Noun - luoppal: # GÁMAS
    luoppal+N+Sg+Nom: luoppal 
    luoppal+N+Sg+Ine: luobbalin 
    luoppal+N+Sg+Ill: luobbalij

  Noun - lárkav: # GÁMAS
    lárkav+N+Sg+Nom: lárkav 
    lárkav+N+Sg+Ine: lárkkamin 
    lárkav+N+Sg+Ill: lárkkamij

  Noun - návdár: # SÅHKÅR
    návdár+N+Sg+Nom: návdár 
    návdár+N+Sg+Ine: návddárin 
    návdár+N+Sg+Ill: návddárij

  Noun - pihper: # SÅHKÅR
    pihper+N+Sg+Nom: pihper 
    pihper+N+Sg+Ine: pihppárin 
    pihper+N+Sg+Ill: pihppárij

  Noun - stájnar: # SÅHKÅR
    stájnar+N+Sg+Nom: stájnar 
    stájnar+N+Sg+Ine: stájnnarin 
    stájnar+N+Sg+Ill: stájnnarij

  Noun - tjieller: # SÅHKÅR
    tjieller+N+Sg+Nom: tjieller 
    tjieller+N+Sg+Ine: tjællárin
    tjieller+N+Sg+Ill: tjællárij

  Noun - adám: # GAHPER
    adám+N+Sg+Nom: adám 
    adám+N+Sg+Ine: adámin 
    adám+N+Sg+Ill: adámij

  Noun - albasj: # GAHPER
    albasj+N+Sg+Nom: albasj 
    albasj+N+Sg+Ine: albatjin 
    albasj+N+Sg+Ill: albatjij

  Noun - ulmusj: # GAHPER
    ulmusj+N+Sg+Nom: ulmusj 
    ulmusj+N+Sg+Ine: ulmutjin 
    ulmusj+N+Sg+Ill: ulmutjij

  Noun - berun: # GAHPER
    berun+N+Sg+Nom: berun 
    berun+N+Sg+Ine: berunin 
    berun+N+Sg+Ill: berunij

  Noun - boajtok: # GAHPER
    boajtok+N+Sg+Nom: boajtok 
    boajtok+N+Sg+Ine: boajtogin 
    boajtok+N+Sg+Ill: boajtogij

  Noun - tjåttå: # BENA
    tjåttå+N+Sg+Nom: tjåttå
    tjåttå+N+Sg+Ine: tjåddågin 
    tjåttå+N+Sg+Ill: tjåddågij

  Noun - buojda: # BENA
    buojda+N+Sg+Nom: buojda 
    buojda+N+Sg+Ine: buojddagin 
    buojda+N+Sg+Ill: buojddagij

  Noun - giera: # BENA
    giera+N+Sg+Nom: giera 
    giera+N+Sg+Ine: gierragin 
    giera+N+Sg+Ill: gierragij

  Noun - deppa: # BENA
    deppa+N+Sg+Nom: deppa 
    deppa+N+Sg+Ine: dæbbagin 
    deppa+N+Sg+Ill: dæbbagij

  Noun - sievtev: # BAVSEV
    sievtev+N+Sg+Nom: sievtev 
    sievtev+N+Sg+Ine: siektimin 
    sievtev+N+Sg+Ill: siektimij

  Noun - sádev: # BAVSEV
    sádev+N+Sg+Nom: sádev 
    sádev+N+Sg+Ine: sádimin 
    sádev+N+Sg+Ill: sádimij

  Noun - gårdal: # GÅRDAL
    gårdal+N+Sg+Nom: gårdal 
    gårdal+N+Sg+Ine: goarddalin 
    gårdal+N+Sg+Ill: goarddalij

  Noun - rábev: # RÁBEV
    rábev+N+Sg+Nom: rábev
    rábev+N+Sg+Ine: ráhpugin 
    rábev+N+Sg+Ill: ráhpugij

  Noun - sekkas: # SEKKAS
    sekkas+N+Sg+Nom: sekkas
    sekkas+N+Sg+Ine: sæggasin #Korhonen seggasin
    sekkas+N+Sg+Ill: sæggasij # Korhonen seggasij

  Noun - sjuváj: # DERDAJ
    sjuváj+N+Sg+Nom: sjuváj 
    sjuváj+N+Sg+Ine: sjuvvagin 
    sjuváj+N+Sg+Ill: sjuvvagij

  Noun - guovsojvuojoj: # GUOVSOJVUOJOJ
    guovsojvuojoj+N+Sg+Nom: guovsojvuojoj 
    guovsojvuojoj+N+Sg+Ine: guovsojvuodjomin
    guovsojvuojoj+N+Sg+Ill: guovsojvuodjomij

  Noun - ritjas: # RITJAS
    ritjas+N+Sg+Nom: ritjas 
    ritjas+N+Sg+Ine: rihtjasin 
    ritjas+N+Sg+Ill: rihtjasij

  Noun - tsålkes: # TJÅLKES
    tsålkes+N+Sg+Nom: tsålkes 
    tsålkes+N+Sg+Ine: tsoalkkasin 
    tsålkes+N+Sg+Ill: tsoalkkasij

  Noun - báhkovájes: # VÁJES
    báhkovájes+N+Sg+Nom: báhkovájes
    báhkovájes+N+Sg+Ine: báhkovádjasin
    báhkovájes+N+Sg+Ill: báhkovádjasij

  Noun - iednep: # BÁRNEP
    iednep+N+Sg+Nom: iednep 
    iednep+N+Sg+Ine: iednebun 
    iednep+N+Sg+Ill: iednebuj

  Noun - sågas: # SÅGAS
    sågas+N+Sg+Nom: sågas 
    sågas+N+Sg+Ine: sågaskin 
    sågas+N+Sg+Ill: sågaskij

  Noun - ságe: # SÁGE
    ságe+N+Sg+Nom: ságe 
    ságe+N+Sg+Ine: sáhkahin 
    ságe+N+Sg+Ill: sáhkahij

  Noun - butjes: # BUTJES
    butjes+N+Sg+Nom: butjes 
    butjes+N+Sg+Ine: buttjásin 
    butjes+N+Sg+Ill: buttjásij

  Noun - bæsoj: # BØSOJ
    bæsoj+N+Sg+Nom: bæsoj 
    bæsoj+N+Sg+Ine: bessugin 
    bæsoj+N+Sg+Ill: bessugij
